Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1279.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Reduce the Red Tape for Housing Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Housing development project." A new construction or substantial renovation of a residential real estate project."Office." The Office of Transformation and Opportunity established by Executive Order 2023-05."Permit related to housing construction." A permit or 12345678910111213141516171819 approval required by law or regulation to be issued by an executive agency that is involved in a housing development project to a housing developer, contractor or subcontractor in order to commence, continue or support a housing development project."Third-party reviewer." An independent contractor engaged by the housing developer of a housing development project to inspect, review and provide an independent evaluation, including recommendation for approval or denial, of an application for a permit related to housing construction.Section 3. Housing construction permits.Each executive agency that issues permits related to housing construction shall:(1) Designate a point of contact for coordination and efficient processing of permits related to housing construction.(2) No later than 120 days after the effective date of this paragraph, submit to the Office of the Governor and the office updated permit application processing procedures with timelines for permits related to housing construction.(3) No later than 90 days after the effective date of this paragraph, draft and submit to the Office of the Governor for review and approval standards and procedures for applicants for permits related to housing construction projects to hire third-party reviewers to help expedite permitting timelines at the applicant's expense, including:(i) Registration procedures and required qualifications for third-party reviewers.(ii) Rules governing conflicts of interest for third-party reviewers.20260SB1279PN1756 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) Procedures for review and approval or denial of recommendations made by third-party reviewers.(iv) Provisions requiring an executive agency to follow recommendations made by third-party reviewers, except in cases of clear error, serious deficiency or conflict of interest.(4) Upon approval by the Office of the Governor, complete implementation of the new third-party permitting standards and procedures for permits related to housing development projects no later than 180 days after the effective date of this paragraph.(5) No later than 90 days after the effective date of this paragraph, provide to the Office of the Governor a written enumeration and assessment of additional potential legislative, regulatory and administrative actions to increase efficiency in permitting processes.(6) For permit applications that require review by multiple executive agencies or by different levels of government, to the extent allowed by law, engage in simultaneous, rather than sequential, review of the permit applications.(7) No later than 90 days after the effective date of this section, provide written recommendations to the Office of the Governor for ways to increase predictability and transparency related to applications for permits related to housing construction.(8) Fully digitize permit applications and permit fee payments within the extent of budgetary authority no later than 180 days after the effective date of this section.(9) Seek every opportunity to provide transparency in 20260SB1279PN1756 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the permit application process and, whenever possible, reduce processing times.Section 4. Commonwealth Housing Regulatory Compliance Officer.(a) Designation.--The office shall designate a Commonwealth Housing Regulatory Compliance Officer to facilitate navigation through Federal, State and local permitting processes and act as a liaison between the office, executive agencies, local governments and planning and zoning authorities, housing developers and other stakeholders and local communities.(b) Duties.--The Commonwealth Housing Regulatory Compliance Officer's duties shall include:(1) Coordinating and reporting on the activities undertaken by executive agencies under section 3.(2) Facilitating and participating on the office's behalf in discussions between units of State government, local government and housing developers to assist with navigation through permitting requirements and processes.(3) Evaluating methods to improve the housing building materials supply chain in this Commonwealth.(4) Gathering and compiling information on local permitting and planning and zoning processes throughout this Commonwealth and identifying hurdles to timely housing development in those processes.(5) Tracking the progress of housing development projects throughout this Commonwealth and providing periodic updates to office leadership and the Office of the Governor on housing production in this Commonwealth.(6) Submitting an annual report to the Urban Affairs and Housing Committee of the Senate, the Housing and Community Development Committee of the House of Representatives, the 20260SB1279PN1756 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Local Government Committee of the Senate and the Local Government Committee of the House of Representatives on the activities undertaken under this subsection.(C) COSTS.--UPON REQUEST OF THE OFFICE, THE PENNSYLVANIA HOUSING FINANCE AGENCY SHALL REIMBURSE THE OFFICE FOR COSTS INCURRED IN IMPLEMENTING THIS SECTION.Section 5. Timelines for permits related to housing construction.(a) Completeness review.--No later than 10 business days after receiving an application for a permit related to housing construction, an executive agency shall determine whether the application is complete and provide written notice to the person who submitted the application. If the application is incomplete, the written notice shall identify the information needed to complete the application.(b) Technical review.--If an application is complete, the executive agency shall complete the technical review of the application no later than 30 business days after determining that the application is complete. If additional time is necessary, the executive agency may extend the technical review period for no more than 15 business days and shall provide written notice of the extension to the person who submitted the application.(c) Failure to meet deadline.--If an executive agency fails to meet a deadline under subsection (a) or (b), the application for the permit related to housing construction shall be deemed approved unless the person who submitted the application agrees in writing to an extension.Section 6. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1279PN1756 - 5 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930